Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9 Workers' Compensation
Subchapter 4
— Employer Liability — Insurance

Effective Dates.

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 21: Feb. 13, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the welfare of both employer and employee is of primary interest and concern to the State of Arkansas; that the maximum benefits presently payable under the Workers' Compensation law are inadequate due to the steadily increasing cost of living and should be increased immediately to meet said increase in the cost of living; that certain other provisions should be clarified or modified, and that it is in the best interest of both employers and employees that this be accomplished as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 72, § 3: Feb. 16, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Worker's Compensation Commission should have the flexibility of establishing the amount of deposit or surety bond to be required in order to satisfy the Commission that a group self-insurer has the ability to meet its liabilities under the Worker's Compensation law; that the present law does not provide such flexibility and that this Act is immediately necessary to so provide. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 806, § 3: Apr. 8, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the indemnity bond, surety bond or security requirements necessary in order to obtain the status of a self-insured entity for municipalities, counties, or the State of Arkansas and its political subdivisions are unduly burdensome. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 941, § 4: Apr. 13, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the Workers' Compensation Law, sole proprietorship and partnership may elect to cover the sole proprietor and partners under the Workers' Compensation Law; that when the sole proprietorships or partnerships fail to make that election, the prime contractors' Workers' Compensation insurance carriers are including the prime contractors' payments to the sole proprietor and partners in computing the premium for the prime contractors' Workers' Compensation coverage even though the carrier does not provide coverage for those sole proprietors or partners; that such occurrences are inequitable and fundamentally unfair; that this Act prohibits such unfair treatment of prime contractors; and that the inequity will continue until this Act becomes effective; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 980, § 3: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certified audited financial statements of members of self-insured groups are not necessary after initial formation of the group, are burdensome and add unnecessary expense, and that an acceptable quality of financial statements can be obtained through other means. Many members of existing self-insured groups will be forced to withdraw from such groups unless present law which may be deemed to require certified audited statements is changed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the public peace, health and safety, shall be in force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 21: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1227 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 561, § 5: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the workers' compensation risk pool is being transferred by this Act from the Workers' Compensation Commission to the Insurance Department; that the transfer should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year in order to comport with the appropriations for the next fiscal year for the Workers' Compensation Commission and the Insurance Department; that this Act may not go into effect on July 1, 1991 unless this emergency clause is adopted. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 41: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Workers' Compensation Law is in immediate need of substantial revision; that this act accomplishes immediate revision; and that this act shall go into effect as soon as is practical which is determined to be July 1, 1993; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after July 1, 1993. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993. Furthermore, the provisions of this act shall apply only to injuries which occur after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 825, § 14: Mar. 29, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that many of the small business operators of the state of Arkansas are currently being forced to pay excessive rates to provide workers compensation insurance for their employees and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to grant them relief and to continue coverage for their employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after its passage.”

Acts 2003, No. 468, § 3 [2]: Mar. 18, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the financial well being of self-insured employers in this state is unduly burdened by the requirement to obtain excess insurance; and that this act is immediately necessary to relieve that burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-9-401. Employer's liability for compensation.

Every employer should secure compensation to its employees and pay or provide compensation for their disability or death from compensable injury arising out of and in the course of employment without regard to fault as a cause of the injury.

There shall be no liability for compensation under this chapter where the injury or death was substantially occasioned by the willful intention of the injured employee to bring about such compensable injury or death.

The primary obligation to pay compensation is upon the employer, and the procurement of a policy of insurance by an employer to cover the obligation in respect to this chapter shall not relieve the employer of the obligation.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 5, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1305; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 3; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 9.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-402. Liability of prime contractors and subcontractors — Sole proprietorships or partnerships.

Where a subcontractor fails to secure compensation required by this chapter, the prime contractor shall be liable for compensation to the employees of the subcontractor unless there is an intermediate subcontractor who has workers' compensation coverage.

Any contractor or the contractor's insurance carrier who shall become liable for the payment of compensation on account of injury to or death of an employee of his or her subcontractor may recover from the subcontractor the amount of the compensation paid or for which liability is incurred.

The claim for the recovery shall constitute a lien against any moneys due or to become due to the subcontractor from the prime contractor.

A claim for recovery, however, shall not affect the right of the injured employee or the dependents of the deceased employee to recover compensation due from the prime contractor or his or her insurance carrier.

When a sole proprietorship or partnership fails to elect to cover the sole proprietor or partners under this chapter, the prime contractor is not liable under this chapter for injuries sustained by the sole proprietor or partners if the sole proprietor or partners are not employees of the prime contractor.

A sole proprietor or the partners of a partnership who do not elect to be covered by this chapter and be deemed employees thereunder and who deliver to the prime contractor a current certification of noncoverage issued by the Workers' Compensation Commission shall be conclusively presumed not to be covered by the law or to be employees of the prime contractor during the term of his or her certification or any renewals thereof.

A certificate of noncoverage may not be presented to a subcontractor who does not have workers' compensation coverage.

This provision shall not affect the rights or coverage of any employees of the sole proprietor or of the partnership.

Furthermore, the prime contractor's insurance carrier is not liable for injuries to the sole proprietor or partners described in this section who have provided a current certification of noncoverage, and the carrier shall not include compensation paid by the prime contractor to the sole proprietor or partners described above in computing the insurance premium for the prime contractor.

Any prime contractor who after being presented with a current certification of noncoverage by a sole proprietor or partnership nonetheless compels the sole proprietor or partnership to pay or contribute to workers' compensation coverage of that sole proprietor or partnership shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Furthermore, any prime contractor who compels a sole proprietor or partnership to obtain a certification of noncoverage when the sole proprietor or partnership does not desire to do so is guilty of a Class D felony.

Furthermore, any applicant who makes a false statement when applying for a certification of noncoverage or any renewals thereof shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

A certification of noncoverage issued by the commission after July 1, 2001, shall be valid for two (2) years after the effective date stated thereon. Both the effective date and the expiration date must be listed on the face of the certificate by the commission. The certificate must expire at midnight two (2) years from its issue date, as noted on the face of the certificate.

Any certification of noncoverage that is in effect on July 1, 2001, shall expire as follows:

A certification of noncoverage issued in the years 1993 or 1994 shall expire at midnight on September 30, 2001;

A certification of noncoverage issued in the years 1995 or 1996 shall expire at midnight on December 31, 2001;

A certification of noncoverage issued in the years 1997 or 1998 shall expire at midnight on March 31, 2002; and

A certification of noncoverage issued in the years 1999 or 2000 shall expire at midnight on June 30, 2002.

The commission may assess a fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) with each application for a certification of noncoverage or any renewals thereof.

Any certification of noncoverage issued by the commission shall contain the social security number and notarized signature of the applicant. The notarization shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the commission.

The commission may prescribe by rule forms and procedures for issuing or renewing a certification of noncoverage.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 6, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1306; Acts 1987, No. 941, § 1; 1993, No. 796, § 10; 2001, No. 1757, § 6; 2005, No. 1917, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 12, provided:

“All laws and parts of laws expressly in conflict with this act are repealed. No part of Act 796 of 1993 shall be impliedly repealed by this act or Act 1552 of 1999.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1987, No. 941, § 2, provided that the act did not repeal or supersede Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 6.

11-9-403. Waiver of exclusion or exemption.

Any employer carrying on any exempted or excepted employment may at any time waive the exemptions or exceptions as to any employee or all employees engaged in the employment as the employer may elect by giving notice of waiver of the exemptions or exceptions as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Notice of waiver of exclusion or exemption referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall be given in accordance with the following provisions:

Every employer who waives the exclusion or exemption shall post, and keep posted, in and about the employer's place of business typewritten or printed notices to that effect in accordance with a form to be prescribed by the Workers' Compensation Commission, and the employer shall file a duplicate of the notice with the commission.

The notice shall be given at least thirty (30) days prior to any injury. However, if the injury occurs less than thirty (30) days after the date of employment, the notice, if given at the time of employment, shall be sufficient notice.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, §§ 7, 8, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1307, 81-1308.

11-9-404. Security for compensation.

Every employer shall secure the payment of compensation under this chapter:

By insuring and keeping insured the payment of the compensation with any carrier authorized to write workers' compensation insurance;

By furnishing satisfactory proof to the Workers' Compensation Commission of the employer's financial ability to pay compensation and receiving an authorization from the commission to pay compensation directly.

The commission, as a condition to such authorization, may require the employer, except municipalities, counties, or the State of Arkansas or its political subdivisions, to deposit in a depository designated by the commission either an indemnity bond, irrevocable letter of credit, or securities of any kind and in an amount determined by the commission, subject to such reasonable conditions as the commission may prescribe. The conditions shall include authorization to the commission, in case of default, to sell any securities sufficient to pay compensation awards or to bring suit on the bonds or the letter of credit to procure prompt payment of compensation under this chapter.

Any employer securing compensation in accordance with the provisions of this subdivision (a)(2) shall be known as a self-insurer and shall be classed as a carrier of its own insurance.

A self-insurer may have the privilege of securing those portions of the payment of compensation under this chapter as the self-insurer shall elect by insuring the portions with a company approved by the commission. The liability of the company shall be limited to those features and liabilities of this chapter as are expressly stated, and none other;

The commission, under such rules as it may prescribe, may permit two (2) or more employers engaged in the same type of business activity or pursuit to enter into agreements to pool their liabilities under this section for the purpose of qualifying as self-insurers, and each such approved group shall be classified as an homogeneous self-insurer.

The commission, under such rules as it may prescribe, may permit two (2) or more employers who are members of the same trade or professional association to enter into agreements to pool their liabilities under this section for the purpose of qualifying as self-insurers, and each such approved group shall be classified as a common self-insurer.

The trade or professional association shall have been in active existence for at least three (3) years; such associations shall have a constitution or bylaws; and all trustees shall be participants in the common self-insurer program, shall have members that support the association by regular payment of dues on an annual, semiannual, quarterly, or monthly basis, and shall be created in good faith for purposes other than that of creating workers' compensation common self-insurer pools.

No two (2) trade or professional associations shall be allowed to combine or join each other and qualify as a common self-insurer.

In order to qualify as group self-insurers, these groups shall furnish to or satisfy the commission as to the following:

An application on a form prescribed by the commission by an elected board of trustees to establish a self-insurance fund to be administered under the direction of the trustees;

The application shall be accompanied by:

An indemnity agreement in a form satisfactory to the commission jointly and severally binding the groups and each member of the groups to comply with the provisions of the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq.; and

An individual application by each member of the groups applying for coverage in the fund;

A current, audited financial statement of each member of the groups showing a combined net worth of all members applying for coverage of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), a combined ratio of current assets to current liabilities of not less than one to one (1:1), and working capital of an amount establishing financial ability and liquidity sufficient to pay normal compensation claims promptly;

That the groups deposit and maintain with the commission acceptable securities or have posted a surety bond issued by a corporate surety authorized to do business in the State of Arkansas, in an amount determined by the commission, but not less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

However, this subdivision (a)(3)(C)(iv) shall not be applicable to municipalities, counties, or the State of Arkansas and its political subdivisions;

That there exist ample facilities and competent personnel of good character within the groups, or through an approved service organization, for the groups to service their own programs with respect to underwriting matters, claims and adjusting, industrial safety engineering, accounting, and financial management;

That the groups maintain excess insurance with an insurance company authorized to do business in this state in an amount acceptable to the commission.

However, this subdivision (a)(3)(C)(vi) shall not be applicable to municipalities, counties, or the State of Arkansas and its political subdivisions; and

That such financial statements, payroll records, accident experience, and compensation reports and such other reports and statements are filed at such time and in such manner as the commission shall require.

However, any fund which fails or refuses to file the reports within the time limits prescribed by the commission shall be subject to a civil penalty in such amount as the commission may prescribe not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per infraction per day, and the failure or refusal may be considered good cause for revocation or suspension of self-insurance privileges;

Each member of the groups shall file financial reports and statements at such times and in such manner as the commission may require to satisfy itself as to the continued financial stability of the member; and

In order to continue to qualify as a homogeneous self-insurer fund or common self-insurer fund, the groups shall continue to meet the minimum requirements as set forth in subdivision (a)(3) of this section or as prescribed by the commission.

Except for the initial qualification of the groups, a certified audited financial statement shall not be required of any member of a group either for initial membership or as a condition for continued membership in the group.

However, each financial statement filed with the commission shall be duly certified by the president and treasurer of the member, in the case of a corporation, and by the owner and general partners, respectively, in the case of an individual proprietorship or partnership, to the effect that such financial statement is true and correct to the best of the knowledge and belief of the officer, individual owner, or partner and truly reflects the financial condition of the member.

Any person who knowingly files a false or fraudulent financial statement under the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or both.

Jurisdiction for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter or any appeal therefrom shall be in the Pulaski County Circuit Court. The underlying purpose of this chapter is to assure the payment of benefits due employees, and this chapter shall be liberally construed to that end.

The commission may suspend or revoke any authorization to a self-insurer for a good cause shown after a hearing at which the self-insurer shall be entitled to be heard in person or by counsel and to present evidence.

No suspension or revocation shall affect the liability of any self-insurer already incurred.

Authorization to write compensation insurance under this chapter shall be given to a carrier only after the carrier has received a certificate of authority from the Insurance Commissioner to transact the business of workers' compensation insurance in Arkansas and the commission has been notified in writing of the issuance of the certificate of authority.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 36, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1979, No. 994, § 1; 1981, No. 72, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1336; Acts 1987, No. 806, §§ 1, 2; 1987, No. 980, § 1; 1989, No. 821, § 3; 1993, No. 683, § 1; 1995, No. 825, § 1; 2003, No. 468, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 784.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(3)(A).

11-9-405. Substitution of carrier for employer.

In any case where the employer is not a self-insurer, in order that the liability for compensation imposed by this chapter may be most effectively discharged by the employer and in order that the administration of this chapter with respect to that liability may be facilitated, the Workers' Compensation Commission shall by rule provide for the discharge by the carrier, for the employer, of the obligations and duties of the employer with respect to such liability imposed by this chapter upon the employer as it considers proper in order to effectuate the provisions of this chapter.

For such purpose:

Notice to or knowledge of an employer of the occurrence of the injury shall be notice to or knowledge of the carrier;

Jurisdiction over the employer by the commission or by any court under this chapter shall be jurisdiction over the carrier; and

Any requirements by the commission or any court under any compensation order, finding, or decision shall be binding upon the carrier in the same manner and to the same extent as upon the employer.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 37, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1337; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 785.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a).

11-9-406. Failure to secure payment of compensation — Penalty.

Any employer required to secure the payment of compensation under this chapter who fails to secure compensation shall be subject to a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) as determined by the Workers' Compensation Commission payable to the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund or be guilty of a Class D felony.

This subsection shall not affect any other liability of the employer under this chapter.

Whenever the commission has reason to believe that any employer required to secure the payment of compensation under this chapter has failed to do so, the commission shall serve upon the employer a proposed order declaring the employer to be in violation of this chapter and containing the amount, if any, of the civil penalty to be assessed against the employer pursuant to subdivision (b)(5) of this section.

An employer may contest a proposed order of the commission issued pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section by filing with the commission, within twenty (20) days of receipt of the proposed order, a written request for a hearing.

Such a request for a hearing need not be in any particular form but shall specify the grounds upon which the person contests the proposed order, the proposed assessment, or both.

If a written request for hearing is not filed with the commission within this time, the proposed order, the proposed penalty, or both, shall be a final order of the commission and shall not be subject to further review by any court.

A proposed order by the commission pursuant to this section is prima facie correct, and the burden is upon the employer to prove that the proposed order is incorrect.

If the employer alleges that a carrier has contracted to provide it workers' compensation insurance coverage for the period in question, the employer shall include the allegation in its request for hearing and shall name the carrier.

The commission shall promptly notify the carrier of the employer's allegation and of the date of hearing.

The carrier shall promptly, and no later than five (5) days prior to the hearing, respond in writing to the employer's allegation by providing evidence of coverage for the period in question or by affirmatively denying the employer's allegation.

Hearings conducted under this section shall proceed as provided in §§ 11-9-704 — 11-9-711.

The commission may assess a fine against an employer who fails to secure the payment of compensation in an amount up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day of violation payable to the fund.

If an employer fails to secure the payment of compensation or pay any civil penalty assessed against the employer after an order issued pursuant to this section has become final by operation of law or upon appeal, the commission may petition the Pulaski County Circuit Court or of the county where the employer's principal place of business is located for an order enjoining the employer from engaging in further employment until such time as the employer secures the payment of compensation or makes full payment of all civil penalties.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 39, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1339; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 11.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-407. Posting notice of compliance.

Every employer who has secured compensation under the provisions of this chapter shall keep posted in a conspicuous place in and about the employer's place of business typewritten or printed notices in accordance with a form prescribed by the Workers' Compensation Commission. The notices shall state that the employer has secured the payment of compensation in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The notices shall contain the name and address of the carrier, if any, with whom the employer has secured payment of compensation and the date of the expiration of the policy.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 41, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1341.

11-9-408. Insurance policies.

Contents. Every policy or contract of insurance issued by a carrier to an employer to secure the payment of compensation under this chapter shall contain:

Provisions that identify the insured employer and either identify each covered employee or describe covered employees by class or type of labor performed and the estimated number of employees of each such class or type.

No single policy of workers' compensation insurance may be issued to any group of employers who are unaffiliated with one another in terms of ownership, control, or right to participate in the profits of the affiliated enterprises;

Provisions that insolvency or bankruptcy of the employer or discharge therein shall not relieve the carrier from payment of compensation for compensable injuries sustained by an employee during the term of the policy or contract;

The agreement of the carrier that it will promptly pay to the person entitled to compensation every installment of compensation that may be awarded or agreed upon and that this obligation shall not be affected by any default of the employer or by any default in the giving of any notice required by the policy or otherwise.

The agreement shall be construed to be a direct obligation by the carrier to the person entitled to compensation, enforceable in that person's name; and

Such other provisions as the State Insurance Department allows or requires carriers to include in workers' compensation policies as otherwise provided at the Arkansas Workers' Compensation Insurance Plan, § 23-67-301 et seq.

Cancellation.

An employer may cancel coverage with a carrier by giving the carrier at least thirty (30) days' notice, unless a shorter period is permitted under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section.

Cancellation of coverage is effective at 12:01 a.m. thirty (30) days after the date the cancellation notice is received by the carrier, unless a later date is specified in the notice to the carrier.

An employer may cancel coverage effective less than thirty (30) days after written notice is received by the carrier where the employer obtains other coverage or becomes a self-insurer.

A cancellation under this subdivision is effective immediately upon the effective date of the other coverage or upon authorization as a self-insurer.

A notice of cancellation from the carrier shall state the hour and date that cancellation is effective.

A carrier shall not cancel coverage issued to an employer under this chapter prior to the date specified for expiration in the policy or contract or until at least thirty (30) days have elapsed after a notice of cancellation has been mailed to the Workers' Compensation Commission and to the employer, or until ten (10) days have elapsed after the notice has been mailed to the employer and to the commission if the cancellation is for nonpayment of premium.

However, if the employer procures other insurance within the notice period, the effective date of the new policy shall be the cancellation date of the old policy.

Cancellation of coverage by an employer or a carrier shall in no way limit liability that was incurred under the policy or contract prior to the effective date of cancellation.

Coverage.

No policy or contract of insurance shall be issued against liability under this chapter unless the policy or contract covers the entire liability of the employer. Split coverage whereby some employees of an employer are insured by one carrier and other employees are insured by another carrier, or by the Arkansas Workers' Compensation Insurance Plan, § 23-67-301 et seq., or a plan of self-insurance is expressly prohibited except for:

A policy issued in accordance with § 23-92-409 so long as all employees performing services for a client are covered under the same policy, contract, or plan; or

A policy issued covering the liability of an employer or of multiple employers as to specific jobs, ventures, contracts, or undertakings, but only if the policy meets with the reasonable satisfaction and approval of the Insurance Commissioner that the policy is in the best interest of the employers and the employees concerned and does not unduly or improperly affect the continuity of workers' compensation coverage by seriously and negatively affecting other carriers and agents with outstanding policies issued to any of the employers in issue.

As to any questions of liability between the employer and the carrier, the terms of the policy or contract shall govern.

Under such rules as may be adopted by the Insurance Commissioner, and notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, he or she may certify five (5) or more employers as an insurance group which shall be considered an employer for the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 38, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1973, No. 158, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1338; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 12; 2003, No. 1750, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 786.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).